District of Columbia statutes.
42-1901.03

Ownership of individual units.

Each condominium unit shall constitute for all purposes a separate parcel of real estate, distinct from all other condominium units. Any condominium unit may be owned by more than 1 person as joint tenants, as tenants in common, as tenants by the entirety (in the case of spouses or domestic partners), or in any other real estate tenancy relationship recognized under the laws of the District of Columbia.

Mar. 29, 1977, D.C. Law 1-89, title I, § 103, 23 DCR 9532b
Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-233, § 2(c), 38 DCR 261
Sept. 12, 2008, D.C. Law 17-231, § 36(b), 55 DCR 6758
This section is referenced in § 42-1901.01 and § 42-1902.26.
1981 Ed., § 45-1803.
1973 Ed., § 5-1203.
D.C. Law 17-231 substituted “(in the case of spouses or domestic partners)” for “(in the case of husband and wife)”.